Iowa, session 2025-2026, 1415XD.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA:
TLSB 1415XD (2) 91
nls/ko

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
Section 1. Section 9.11, subsection 1, Code 2025, is amended
by adding the following new paragraph:
NEW PARAGRAPH. j. Chapter 524, including as provided in
section 524.303.
Sec. 2. NEW SECTION. 524.2002 Secretary of state —— extra
services —— surcharge.
Upon the request of a filer of a document under this chapter,
the secretary of state shall provide an extra filing service
and assess a surcharge as provided in chapter 9, subchapter II.